Arkansas, session 2025, HB1470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-11-269 is repealed.
19-11-269. Review of information technology plans.
The Office of State Procurement shall ensure that all required
information has been submitted to the Office of Intergovernmental Services
for review of proper planning and technical requirements before the execution
of:
(1) A contract issued under this subchapter that procures
information technology products or services with a total projected contract
amount, including any amendments to or possible extensions of the contract,
of at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); or
(2) A purchase of information technology products or services
made under a cooperative purchase agreement under § 19-11-249.






*JLL186*
02/12/2025 5:40:20 PM JLL186